Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 10. Explosives.

§ 59.1-137.
Definition.

Whenever used in this chapter:

“Explosives” means any chemical compound, mechanical mixture or device the primary or common purpose of which is to function by explosion. The term includes, but is not limited to dynamite and other high explosives, black blasting powder, pellet powder,
initiating explosives, blasting caps, electric blasting caps, detonators, safety fuse, fuse igniters, fuse lighters, squibs, cordeau detonant fuse, instantaneous fuse, detonating cord, igniter cord, igniters and those materials included
in the list published annually in the Federal Register by the Department of the Treasury pursuant to the Organized Crime Control Act of 1970 (18 U.S.C. § 841 et seq.).

History.
Code 1950, § 59-222; 1960, c. 578; 1968, c. 439; 1976, c. 250.

Cross references.

As to transporting hazardous materials, see § 10.1-1450 et seq.

§ 59.1-138.
Record of sales required; signing by purchasers; sales to persons under eighteen prohibited.

Any person selling any explosives covered by this chapter shall keep a record of all such explosives sold, showing the kind and quantity sold, the name and address of the purchaser, and the date of each sale. The person selling such explosives shall also
require any person purchasing such explosives to sign such record at the time of such purchase.

No person shall sell, deliver, give away, or otherwise dispose of any explosives to any individual under eighteen years of age, whether such individual is acting for himself, herself, or for any other person.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-223; 1960, c. 578; 1968, c. 439; 1972, c. 824.

§ 59.1-139.
Persons possessing explosives to give notice of theft.

Any person having in his possession any explosives covered by this chapter shall immediately notify the sheriff of the county or the police officials of the city in which any such explosives are being stored or used in the event that any such explosives
are stolen.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-224; 1960, c. 578; 1968, c. 439.

§ 59.1-140.
Effect of chapter upon municipal regulation.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall:

Affect any existing ordinance, rule or regulation of any city or municipality in this Commonwealth that is not less restrictive than this chapter; or affect, modify or limit the power of such cities or municipalities to make ordinances, rules or regulations
not less restrictive than this chapter, governing the storage, possession, sale and use of explosives within their respective corporate limits.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-225; 1960, c. 578; 1968, c. 439.

§ 59.1-141.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, be punished accordingly.

History.
Code 1950, § 59-226; 1960, c. 578; 1968, c. 439.